Utah statutes.
76-10-1308.   Prosecution.

The following class A misdemeanors may be prosecuted by attorneys of cities and towns, as well as by prosecutors authorized elsewhere in this code to prosecute these alleged violations:

(1)  class A misdemeanor violations of Section 76-10-1302; and

(2)  class A misdemeanor violations of Section 76-10-1304.



Enacted by Chapter 107, 1991 General Session

